New York, session 2025-2026, A8008.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (m) of section 217 of the general municipal 2 law, as added by chapter 617 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (m) A participant who is convicted of the crime of arson in any degree 5 as defined in the penal law or any other felony defined in the penal law 6 where such crime was committed against a volunteer fire department, 7 volunteer fire company, fire district, or fire protection district shall 8 not be eligible to receive benefits from a service award program and 9 shall forfeit any and all rights [he or she] such participant may have 10 had to past or future benefits pursuant to a service award program. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05037-01-5